Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4675.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [256.0141] HUMAN SERVICES SYSTEMS STEERING COMMITTEE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Human Services Systems Steering Committee is established to provide recommendations to the commissioners of human services, information technology services, and children, youth, and families on the development, administration, and business operations of human services information technology systems. For the purposes of this section, "human services systems" means any information technology system used by counties or the commissioner of human services or children, youth, and families. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership; costs. new text end new text begin (a) The steering committee must be composed of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) two members appointed by the commissioner of human services; new text end new text begin (2) two members appointed by the commissioner of children, youth, and families; new text end new text begin (3) six members appointed jointly by the Association of Minnesota Counties, the Minnesota Inter-County Association, and the Minnesota Association of County Social Service Administrators; and new text end new text begin (4) two nonvoting members appointed by the commissioner of information technology services. new text end new text begin (b) One member appointed under paragraph (a), clause (3), and one member appointed under paragraph (a), clause (4), must serve as co-chairpersons for the steering committee. new text end new text begin (c) Steering committee costs must be paid from the budgets of the Department of Human Services, the Department of Information Technology Services, and the Department of Children, Youth, and Families. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The steering committee must provide recommendations on the administration and business operations of current human services systems and the development of any new human services systems. new text end new text begin (b) For each human services system, the steering committee must make recommendations on setting system goals and priorities, allocating system resources, making major system decisions, and tracking total system funding and expenditures from all sources. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The steering committee must meet at least quarterly. new text end new text begin (b) As part of every steering committee meeting, the steering committee must provide the opportunity for oral and written public testimony and comments on steering committee recommendations. new text end new text begin (c) All votes of the steering committee must be recorded, with each member's vote identified. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Implementation of changes; new systems. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioners of human services and children, youth, and families must not implement any new major changes to current human services systems, or implement a new human services system, prior to receiving recommendations from the steering committee and consulting with counties on the changes or development. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioners of human services and children, youth, and families must implement changes to human services systems recommended and passed by at least seven members of the steering committee. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning January 30, 2027, and each January 30 thereafter, the steering committee must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services systems. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) for each human services system, system funding and expenditures, including amounts received in the previous calendar year by funding source and expenditures made in the previous calendar year by funding source; new text end new text begin (2) recommendations made by the steering committee under subdivision 3; and new text end new text begin (3) a list of projects needed to improve human services systems. new text end new text begin (b) The legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services systems must hold a public hearing on the report during the regular legislative session in the year in which the report was submitted. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COUNTY INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS UPDATES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Information technology changes; system focused. new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of information technology systems to update county information technology systems. This appropriation must be used, in collaboration with counties, to fund the following projects: new text end new text begin (1) expand Data Depot to all interested Minnesota counties and Tribal Nations; new text end new text begin (2) expand BlueZone Scripting Collaborative to all interested Minnesota counties and Tribal Nations; new text end new text begin (3) expand piloted artificial intelligence tools for human services to all interested Minnesota counties and Tribal Nations; new text end new text begin (4) develop new user interfaces to replace character-based green screens for the MAXIS and PRISM computer systems through the integration layer; new text end new text begin (5) complete the renewal self-service portal in the Minnesota Eligibility Technology System (METS); new text end new text begin (6) copy all state human services systems policies and procedures into the data warehouse and keep the policies and procedures regularly updated; new text end new text begin (7) develop the ability for METS to note when a recipient has a second pregnancy; and new text end new text begin (8) determine, in collaboration with Minnesota Management and Budget, the dollar amount needed to fund the integration layer tool and the amount needed to allow full implementation for both the MAXIS and PRISM computer systems. new text end new text begin (b) Of the amount appropriated under paragraph (a), $....... is for fully funding the work verification vendor system for child support, health care, and public assistance programs. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Information technology changes; policy focused. new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of information technology systems to update county information technology systems to conform with legislative changes. This appropriation must be used, in collaboration with counties, to fund the following projects: new text end new text begin (1) develop an automated process in the MAXIS computer system to confirm the eligibility for health care program enrollees; new text end new text begin (2) eliminate the duplicative data entry by county eligibility workers, including integrating MNBenefits with the MAXIS computer system and developing a solution to allow recipients to provide updated information through electronic means; new text end new text begin (3) update the MAXIS computer system to require a county eligibility worker to update the shelter and utility panels in MAXIS every time the address panel is updated for Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) applications; new text end new text begin (4) update the MAXIS computer system to allow the state to move to a simplified reporting method for SNAP so that all recipients will report changes on a six-month timeline; new text end new text begin (5) update the MAXIS computer system with correct coding for time-limited recipients receiving SNAP benefits and integrate the coding with other panels in MAXIS; new text end new text begin (6) update the MAXIS computer system eligibility results to reflect the most recent noncitizen eligibility policy for health care programs and SNAP; new text end new text begin (7) update the MAXIS computer system to eliminate the need for county eligibility workers to enter and approve general assistance and SNAP applications separately within the same system, including the ability for MAXIS to translate information between general assistance and SNAP; new text end new text begin (8) initiate a review and modernization of client notices generated by the MAXIS computer system and METS to ensure the notices are clear, accurate, and compliant with all current federal and state requirements and enhance system functionality so the notices automatically populate correct and complete information based on case actions; and new text end new text begin (9) update the MAXIS computer system to allow automatic case noting. new text end new text begin (b) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end